transducer-comparison/burmish-2.foma
#!/usr/local/bin/foma -f

#############################################
## A definition of Proto-Burmish phonology ##
#############################################

define pbInitC [
  b:{*b} | p:{*p} | {ʔp}:{*ʔp} | m:{*m} | {ʔm}:{*ʔm} |
  d:{*d} | t:{*t} | {ʔt}:{*ʔt} | n:{*n} | {ʔn}:{*ʔn} |
  g:{*g} | k:{*k} | {ʔk}:{*ʔk} | ŋ:{*ŋ} | {ʔŋ}:{*ʔŋ} |
  {dz}:{*dz} | {ts}:{*ts} | {ʔts}:{*ʔts} |
  {dʒ}:{*dʒ} | {tʃ}:{*tʃ} | {ʔtʃ}:{*ʔtʃ} | ɲ:{*ɲ} | {ʔɲ}:{*ʔɲ} |
  s:{*s} | {ʔs}:{*ʔs} |
  ʃ:{*ʃ} |
  j:{*j} | {ʔj}:{*ʔj} |
  r:{*r} | {ʔr}:{*ʔr} |
  l:{*l} | {ʔl}:{*ʔl} |
  w:{*w} |
  ʔ:{*ʔ} ];

define pbInitC⋄withMedial [
  b:{*b} | p:{*p} | {ʔp}:{*ʔp} | m:{*m} | {ʔm}:{*ʔm} |
  d:{*d} | t:{*t} | {ʔt}:{*ʔt} | n:{*n} | {ʔn}:{*ʔn} |
  g:{*g} | k:{*k} | {ʔk}:{*ʔk} | ŋ:{*ŋ} | {ʔŋ}:{*ʔŋ} ];

define pbMedial [j:{*j} | r:{*r} | l:{*l} | {rj}:{*rj} ];

define pbDoubleMedial [ {ʔrj}:{*ʔr*j} | {ʔlj}:{*ʔl*j} ];
define pbInitial [ pbInitC | pbInitC⋄withMedial pbMedial | pbDoubleMedial ];


define pbOpenRime [u:{*u} | o:{*o} | ʊ:{*ʊ} | a:{*a} | i:{*i} | e:{*e} | ɛ:{*ɛ} | {ai}:{*ai} | {ui}:{*ui} ];
define pbRimeCore [u:{*u} | o:{*o} | a:{*a} | i:{*i} ];
define pbNasalCoda [m:{*m} | n:{*n} | ŋ:{*ŋ} ];
define pbStopCoda [p:{*p} | t:{*t} | k:{*k} ];
define pbNotationTone [0 | H:H | X:X ];

define pbPlainRimeSeg [[pbOpenRime | pbRimeCore pbNasalCoda]];
define pbPlainRime [pbPlainRimeSeg pbNotationTone];
define pbEnteringRime [pbRimeCore pbStopCoda];
define pbRime [pbPlainRime | pbEnteringRime];

define pbNotationSyllable [pbInitial pbRime];

# Notation changes

define addToneMarks [ pbPlainRimeSeg -> ... Ø || _ .#. ,,
  pbStopCoda @-> ... "入" \\ _ .#.];
define pbTone [Ø | H | X | 入];
define pbSyllable [pbNotationSyllable ∘ addToneMarks];

# Widely shared sound changes
define BurmishDevoicing {*b} -> {*p}, {*d} -> {*t}, {*g} -> {*k}, {*dz} -> {*ts}, {*dʒ} -> {*tʃ}, {*p} -> {*ph}, {*t} -> {*th}, {*k} -> {*kh}, {*ts} -> {*tsh}, {*tʃ} -> {*tʃh} || .#. _ {*} ;

define medial⋄l⇒r {*l} -> {*r} || ? _ ;

define LawBurling {*ʔp} -> {*p}, {*ʔt} -> {*t}, {*ʔk} -> {*k}, {*ʔts} -> {*ts}, {*ʔtʃ} -> {*tʃ}, {*ʔm} -> {*mh}, {*ʔn} -> {*nh}, {*ʔŋ} -> {*ŋh}, {*ʔɲ} -> {*ɲh}, {*ʔs} -> {*s}, {*ʔj} -> {*j}, {*ʔr} -> {*rh}, {*ʔl} -> {*lh} || .#. _ {*} ;

define pbVoicedInitial [
  {*b} | {*m} |
  {*d} | {*n} |
  {*g} | {*ŋ} |
  {*dz} |
  {*dʒ} |
  {*ɲ} |
  {*j} |
  {*r} |
  {*l} |
  {*w} ];

define pbVoicelessInitial [
  {*p} | {*ʔp} | {*ʔm} |
  {*t} | {*ʔt} | {*ʔn} |
  {*k} | {*ʔk} | {*ʔŋ} |
  {*ts} | {*ʔts} |
  {*tʃ} | {*ʔtʃ} |
  {*ʔɲ} |
  {*s} | {*ʔs} |
  {*ʃ} |
  {*ʔr} |
   {*ʔl} |
  {*ʔ} ];

define BurmishToneSplit [
  ? @-> ... "[h]" \\ .#. pbVoicelessInitial ? * _ .#. ,,
  ? @-> ... "[l]" \\ .#. pbVoicedInitial ? * _ .#.];

# Asterisk utilities
define RemoveAsterisks {*} -> 0;
define RejectAsterisks [¬ [? * "*" ? *]];

########################################
## Old Burmese: orthographical filter ##
########################################
## Each language gets two formal components: an "orthographical filter", regex which corresponds to the phonological system of the language, so that the actual transcriptions can be checked wrt the phonological system

define BurmeseSimpleInitial [
   b:{p } |
   p:{p } |  {ph}:{ph } |  m:{m } |  {mh}:{m̥ } |
   t:{t } |  {th}:{th } |  n:{n } |  {nh}:{n̥ } |
   k:{k } |  {kh}:{kh } |  ṅ:{ŋ } |  {ṅh}:{ŋ̊ } |
   c:{tɕ } |  {ch}:{tɕh } |  ñ:{ɲ } |  {ñh}:{ɲ̥ } |
   s:{s } |
   h:{h } |
   w:{w } ];

define BurmeseSimpleInitial⇒ [ BurmeseSimpleInitial:{i } ];

define BurmeseInitial [
   BurmeseSimpleInitial |
   r:{r } |  {rh}:{r̥ } |
   {ry}:{rj } | {rhy}:{r̥j } |
   l:{l } |  {lh}:{l̥ } |
   {ly}:{lj } |  {lhy}:{l̥j } |
   y:{j } |
   0:{ʔ } ];

define BurmeseInitial⇒ [ BurmeseInitial:{i } ];

define BurmeseSimpleVowelRime [
   a:{a } |
   i:{i } |
   {o₁}:{o } |
   {o₂}:{ʊ } |
   u:{u }];

define BurmeseSimpleVowelRime⇒ [ BurmeseSimpleVowelRime:{n } ];

define BurmeseSonorantCodaRime [
   {ay}:{a j } | 
   {am}:{a m } | {an}:{a n } | {aṅ}:{a ŋ } | {añ}:{a ɲ } |
   {iy}:{ə j } |
   {im}:{i m } | {in}:{i n } |
   {o₁y}:{o j } |
   {o₁m}:{o m } | {o₁n}:{o n } | {o₁ṅ}:{o ŋ } |
   {uiw}:{ə w } |
   {uiṅ}:{ə ŋ } |
   {uy}:{u j } |
   {un}:{u n } | {um}:{u m } |
   {o₂ṅ}:{ʊ ŋ } ];

define BurmeseSonorantCodaRime⇒ [ BurmeseSonorantCodaRime:{n c } ];

define BurmeseTonefulRime [ BurmeseSimpleVowelRime | BurmeseSonorantCodaRime ];

define BurmeseTonefulRime⇒ [ BurmeseSimpleVowelRime⇒ | BurmeseSonorantCodaRime⇒ ];

define BurmeseStopcodaRime [
   {ak}:{a k } | {ap}:{a p } | {at}:{a t } | {ac}:{a c } |
   {ip}:{i p } | {it}:{i t } |
   {o₁t}:{o t } | {o₁k}:{o k } |
   {uik}:{ə k } |
   {up}:{u p } | {ut}:{u t } | {o₂k}:{ʊ k }];

define BurmeseStopcodaRime⇒ [ BurmeseStopcodaRime:{n c } ];

define BurmeseMedial [ {ry}:{rj } | {ly}:{lj } | y:{j } | r:{r } | l:{l }];

define BurmeseMedial⇒ [ BurmeseMedial:{m } ];

define BurmeseTone [0:{²²} | ʔ:{⁵³} | ḥ:{⁵⁵}];

define BurmeseTone⇒ [ BurmeseTone:{t} ];

define BurmeseDefaultStopcodaTone [0:{⁴}];

define BurmeseRime [ [BurmeseTonefulRime BurmeseTone] |
[ BurmeseStopcodaRime BurmeseDefaultStopcodaTone] ];

define BurmeseRime⇒ [
   [BurmeseTonefulRime⇒ BurmeseTone⇒] |
   BurmeseStopcodaRime:{n c t} ];

define BurmeseSyllable [BurmeseSimpleInitial (BurmeseMedial) BurmeseRime |
  BurmeseInitial BurmeseRime ];


define BurmeseSyllable⇒ [BurmeseSimpleInitial⇒ (BurmeseMedial⇒) BurmeseRime⇒ |
BurmeseInitial⇒ BurmeseRime⇒ ];

clear
push BurmeseSyllable
save stack burmese-ortho.bin

clear
push BurmeseSyllable⇒
save stack burmese-ortho-template.bin

####################################################################
## A transducer from the current proto-Burmish to Written Burmese ##
####################################################################
## As the two languages are really close to each other, this transducer does a shallow orthographic mapping, just in order to get things done

define j⋄Delete {*j} -> {*ʔ} || .#. _ {*i};

define BurmeseSoundLaws j⋄Delete;

define BurmeseInitialReflexes [
  {*p} -> p, {*ph} -> p h, {*m} -> m, {*mh} -> m h,
  {*t} -> t, {*th} -> t h, {*n} -> n, {*nh} -> n h,
  {*k} -> k, {*kh} -> k h, {*ŋ} -> ṅ, {*ŋh} -> ṅ h,
  {*tʃ} -> c, {*tʃh} -> c h, {*ɲ} -> ñ, {*ɲh} -> ñ h,
  {*ts} -> c, {*tsh} -> c h,
  {*s} -> s,
  {*ʃ} -> s,
  {*j} -> y,
  {*r} -> r, {*rh} -> r h,
  {*rj} -> r y, {*rhj} -> r h y,
  {*l} -> l, {*lh} -> l h,
  {*w} -> w,
  {*ʔ} -> 0
    || .#. _];

define BurmeseTonefulRimeReflexes [
  {*a} -> a, {*ai} -> a y, 
  {*a*m} -> a m, {*a*n} -> a n, {*a*ŋ} -> a ṅ,
  {*e} -> i,
  {*ɛ} -> i,
  {*i} -> i y,
  {*i*m} -> i m, {*i*ŋ} -> a ñ,
  {*o} -> {o₁},
  {*o*n} -> {o₁} n, {*o*ŋ} -> {o₁} ṅ,
  {*u} -> u i w, {*ui} -> u y,
  {*u*m} -> u m, {*u*ŋ} -> {o₂} ṅ,
  {*ʊ} -> u
    || _ pbTone];

define BurmeseStopcodaRimeReflexes [
  {*a*k} -> a k, {*a*p} -> a p, {*a*t} -> a t,
  {*i*p} -> i p, {*i*k} -> a c,
  {*o*k} -> {o₁} k,
  {*u*p} -> u p, {*u*t} -> u t, {*u*k} -> {o₂} k
    || _ pbTone];

define BurmeseMedialReflexes 
  {*rj} -> r y 
  ∘ [{*j} -> y,
     {*r} -> r,
     {*l} -> l];

define BurmeseToneReflexes [Ø -> 0, X -> ʔ, H -> ḥ, 入 -> 0];

clear
regex pbSyllable ∘ LawBurling ∘ BurmishDevoicing # Burmese-Ngochang group
∘ BurmeseSoundLaws
∘ BurmeseInitialReflexes ∘ BurmeseTonefulRimeReflexes ∘ BurmeseStopcodaRimeReflexes ∘ BurmeseMedialReflexes ∘ BurmeseToneReflexes # Burmese specific
∘ RejectAsterisks;
save stack burmese.bin

###############################################
## Longchuan Ngochang: orthographical filter ##
###############################################

define NgochangInitial [
   p |  p h |  m |  m̥ |
   p ʐ | p h ʐ |  m ʐ |  m̥ ʐ |
   f | v |
   t |  t h | t s | t s h | s |
   n |  n̥ |  l |  l̥ |
   t ɕ | t ɕ h | ɕ | ʑ | ȵ | ȵ̥ |
   t ʂ | t ʂ h | ʂ | ʐ |
   k |  k h | x | ŋ | ŋ̊ |
   k ʐ | k h ʐ | x ʐ 
   | 0 ];

define NgochangOpenRhyme [
   i | e | a | ɔ | o | u | ə | ɿ |
   e i | a i | o i | u i |
   i a u | u a i ];

define NgochangNasalRhyme [
   [[i | e | a | ɔ | o | u | ə]
    [m | n | ŋ]] |
   i a m | i a ŋ | u a n | u a ŋ ];

define NgochangStopRhyme [
   [[i | e | a | ɔ | o | u | ə]
    [p | t | k | ʔ]] |
   i a p | i a k | u a t | u a k |
   a i ʔ | u i ʔ | a u ʔ | o u ʔ | u a ʔ];

define NgochangTone [⁵⁵ | ³¹ | ³⁵ | ⁵¹];

define NgochangRime [ [NgochangOpenRhyme | NgochangNasalRhyme | NgochangStopRhyme] NgochangTone];

define NgochangSyllable [NgochangInitial NgochangRime];

clear
push NgochangSyllable
save stack ngochang-ortho.bin

#######################################################################
## A transducer from the current proto-Burmish to Longchuan Ngochang ##
#######################################################################
# Things are done the kosher way, with proper sound changes and everything

# Burmish-Ngochang group common innovation
define u⇒ou {*u} -> {*ou} || _ pbTone;
define ʊ⇒u {*ʊ} -> {*u} || _ pbTone;
define i⇒ei {*i} -> {*ei} || _ pbTone;
define e⇒i {*e} -> {*i} || _ pbTone;

define PreNgochang pbSyllable ∘ LawBurling ∘ BurmishDevoicing
 ∘ u⇒ou ∘ ʊ⇒u ∘ i⇒ei ∘ e⇒i ∘ medial⋄l⇒r;

# Longchuan Ngochang
# 1. Sound laws

define ak⇒aʔ {*k} -> {*ʔ} || {*a} _, {*o} _, {*u} _;
define a⇒ɔ {*a} -> {*ɔ} || _ pbTone, _ {*ʔ}, _ {*ŋ};
define ou⇒au {*ou} -> {*au} || _ pbTone;
define ru⇒ro {*u} -> {*o} || {*} (t) ʂ (h) _, {*r} _ ;
define ʃ⇒ʂ {ʃ} -> {ʂ} || {*} (t) _ (h) ;
define ɔ⇒ua {*ɔ} -> {*ua} || {*r} _, {*} (t) ʂ (h) _, _ {*ŋ} ;
define iŋ⇒əŋ {*i} -> {*ə} || _ {*k}, _ {*ŋ};
define sə⇒ʂə {*s} -> {*ʂ} || _ {*ə};
define ʂi⇒ʂə {*i} -> {*ə} || {*} (t) ʂ (h) _, {*r} _ ;
define ni⇒ɲi {*n} -> {*ɲ} || _ {*i}, _ {*j};
define ei⇒i {*ei} -> {*i};
define ai⇒i {*ai} -> {*i};
define ʂi⇒ʂɿ {*i} -> {*ɿ} || {*} (t) ʂ (h) _, {*r} _ ;
define im⇒in {*m} -> {*n}, {*p} -> {*t} || {*i} _ ;
define w⋄Rounding [{*w*a} -> {*w*ɔ} , {*w*ɔ} -> {*ʔ*o}];
define w⋄Delete {*w} -> {*ʔ} || .#. _ {*ɔ}, .#. _ {*o};
define j⋄Delete {*j} -> {*ʔ} || .#. _ {*i};
define k⋄Palatalization {*k} -> {*tɕ}, {*kh} -> {*tɕh} || _ {*j} ;
define rh⇒s {*rh} -> {*s};
define j⇒ʑ {*j} -> {*ʑ} || .#. _ ;
define mi⇒ɲi {*m} -> {*ɲ} || _ {*i}, _ {*j};
define kh⇒x {*kh} -> {*x};
define ɛ⇒a {*ɛ} -> {*a};

define NgochangReflexes PreNgochang
.o. ak⇒aʔ .o. a⇒ɔ .o. ou⇒au .o. ru⇒ro .o. ʃ⇒ʂ .o. ɔ⇒ua .o. iŋ⇒əŋ .o. sə⇒ʂə .o. ʂi⇒ʂə .o. ni⇒ɲi .o. ei⇒i .o. ai⇒i .o. ʂi⇒ʂɿ .o. im⇒in .o. w⋄Rounding .o. w⋄Delete .o. j⋄Delete .o. k⋄Palatalization .o. rh⇒s .o. j⇒ʑ .o. mi⇒ɲi .o. kh⇒x .o. ɛ⇒a;

# 2. Orthography
define NgochangCoalesceYod {*j} -> 0
  || _ {*i}, ɕ (h) _, ɲ _;

define NgochangInitialNotation [
  {*p} -> p, {*ph} -> p h, {*m} -> m, {*mh} -> m̥,
  {*t} -> t, {*th} -> t h, {*n} -> n, {*nh} -> n̥,
  {*k} -> k, {*kh} -> k h, {*ŋ} -> ŋ, {*ŋh} -> ŋ̊,
  {*tʃ} -> t ɕ, {*tʃh} -> t ɕ h, {*ɲ} -> ȵ, {*ɲh} -> ȵ̥,
  {*s} -> s,
  {*r} -> ʐ,
  {*l} -> l, {*lh} -> l̥,
  {*ʔ} -> 0
    || .#. _ {*}];

define NgochangNotation [
  {*r} -> ʐ];

define NgochangToneNotation [Ø -> ⁵⁵, X -> ³⁵, H -> ³¹, 入 -> ⁵⁵];

define Ngochang NgochangReflexes
  ∘ NgochangCoalesceYod
  ∘ NgochangToneNotation
  ∘ NgochangInitialNotation
  ∘ NgochangNotation
  ∘ RemoveAsterisks;

clear
push Ngochang
save stack ngochang.bin

#################################
## Maru: orthographical filter ##
#################################

define MaruInitial [
   p |  p h |  m |
   p j | p h l |  m j |
   f | v |
   t |  t h | n | l |
   t s | t s h | s |
   t ʃ | t ʃ h | ʃ | ʒ | j |
   k |  k h | x | ŋ | ɣ |
   k j | k h j | ŋ j |
   0 ];

define MaruOpenRhyme [
   [ i | ɛ | a | ɔ | u | ə | ø | ɛ̃ | ɔ̃ ] ( "_"  ) |
   [ a | ɔ | u ] ( "_"  ) i |
   [ a ] ( "_"  ) u
];

define MaruNasalRhyme [
   [ ɛ | a | ɔ | u ] ( "_"  ) m |
   [ i | a | ɔ | u ] ( "_"  ) n |
   ɛ n | ə n |
   [ i | ɛ | a | ɔ | u | ə ] ( "_"  ) ŋ |
   a ( "_"  ) u ŋ
];

define MaruStopRhyme [
   [ ɛ | a | ɔ ] ( "_"  ) p |
   [ ɛ | a | ɔ | u ] ( "_"  ) t |
   [ i | a | ɔ | u ] ( "_"  ) k |
   ə k |
   [ ɛ | a | ɔ | ø ] ( "_"  ) ʔ |
   a ( "_"  ) u k 
];

define MaruTone [⁵⁵ | ³⁵ | ³¹];
